Washington statutes.
RCW 11.86.080

Rights under other statutes or rules not abridged.

This chapter shall not abridge the right of any person, apart from this chapter, under any existing or future statute or rule of law, to disclaim any interest or to assign, convey, release, renounce or otherwise dispose of any interest.

[ 1973 c 148 s 9.]